Oklahoma, session 2025, SB923.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2357.403, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 66, O.S.L. 2024 (68 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 2357.403), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2357.403. A. This act shall be known and may be cited


as the “Oklahoma Affordable Housing Act”.


B. As used in this section:


1. “Allocation year” means the year for which the Oklahoma


Housing Finance Agency allocates credits pursuant to this section;


2. “Eligibility statement” means a statement authorized and


issued by the Oklahoma Housing Finance Agency certifying that a

Req. No. 1384 Page 1


given project qualifies for the Oklahoma Affordable Housing Tax


Credit authorized by this section. The Oklahoma Housing Finance


Agency, under Title 330, Oklahoma Housing Finance Agency, Chapter


36, Affordable Housing Tax Credit Program Rules, shall promulgate


rules establishing criteria upon which the eligibility statements


will be issued. The eligibility statement shall specify the amount


of Oklahoma Affordable Housing Tax Credits allocated to a qualified


project. The Oklahoma Housing Finance Agency shall only authorize


the tax credits created by this section to qualified projects which


are placed in service after July 1, 2015, but which shall not be


used to reduce tax liability accruing prior to January 1, 2016. For


qualifying projects placed in service after January 1, 2026, the


Oklahoma Housing Finance Authority shall only authorize the tax


credits created by this section to low-income buildings that meet


the definition of workforce housing;


3. “Federal low-income housing tax credit” means the federal


tax credit as provided in Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended;


4. “Oklahoma Affordable Housing Tax Credit” means the tax


credit created by this section;


5. “Qualified project” means a qualified low-income building as


that term is defined in Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended; and



Req. No. 1384 Page 2


6. “Taxpayer” means a person, firm or corporation subject to


the tax imposed by Section 2355 of this title or an insurance


company subject to the tax imposed by Section 624 or 628 of Title 36


of the Oklahoma Statutes or other financial institution subject to


the tax imposed by Section 2370 of this title; and


7. “Workforce housing” means housing occupied or reserved for


occupancy by households with a gross household income between sixty


percent (60%) and one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the median


gross income for households of the same size in the county in which


the municipality is located.


C. For qualified projects placed in service after July 1, 2015,


the amount of state tax credits created by this section which are


allocated to a project shall not exceed that of the federal low-


income housing tax credits for a qualified project. The total


Oklahoma Affordable Housing Tax Credits allocated to all qualified


projects for an allocation year shall not exceed Fifteen Million


Dollars ($15,000,000.00) for allocation years 2026 through 2030, and


Four Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00) for allocation years 2016


through 2025 and 2031 and subsequent allocation years. For purposes


of this section, the “credit period” shall mean the period of ten


(10) taxable years and “placed in service” shall have the same


meaning as is applicable under the federal credit program.


Reallocated and rolled over credits will count against the four-


million-dollar limit of annual limits prescribed by this subsection

Req. No. 1384 Page 3


for their original allocation year and not count against the limit


of the year in which they are allocated.


D. A taxpayer owning an interest in an investment in a


qualified project shall be allowed Oklahoma Affordable Housing Tax


Credits under this section for tax years beginning on or after


January 1, 2016, if the Oklahoma Housing Finance Agency issues an


eligibility statement for such project, which tax credit shall be


allocated among some or all of the partners, members or shareholders


of the taxpayer owning such interest in any manner agreed to by such


partners, members or shareholders. Such taxpayer may assign its


interest in the investment.


E. An insurance company claiming a credit against state premium


tax or retaliatory tax or any other tax imposed by Section 624 or


628 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall not be required to


pay any additional retaliatory tax under Section 628 of Title 36 of


the Oklahoma Statutes as a result of claiming the credit. The


credit may fully offset any retaliatory tax imposed by Section 628


of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


F. The credit authorized by this section shall not be used to


reduce the tax liability of the taxpayer to less than zero ($0.00).


G. Any credit claimed but not used in a taxable year may be


carried forward two (2) subsequent taxable years.


H. The owner of a qualified project eligible for the credit


authorized by this section shall submit, at the time of filing the

Req. No. 1384 Page 4


tax return with the Oklahoma Tax Commission, an eligibility


statement from the Oklahoma Housing Finance Agency. In the case of


failure to attach the eligibility statement, no credit under this


section shall be allowed with respect to such project for that year


until required documents are provided to the Tax Commission.


I. If under Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, a portion of any federal low-income housing credits taken


on a qualified project is required to be recaptured during the first


ten (10) years after a project is placed in service, the taxpayer


claiming Oklahoma Affordable Housing Tax Credits with respect to


such project shall also be required to recapture a portion of such


credits. The amount of Oklahoma Affordable Housing Tax Credits


subject to recapture shall be proportionally equal to the amount of


federal low-income housing credits subject to recapture.


J. The Oklahoma Housing Finance Agency or the Oklahoma Tax


Commission may require the filing of additional documentation


necessary to determine the accuracy of a tax credit claimed.


K. The Oklahoma Affordable Housing Act shall undergo a review


every five (5) years by a committee of nine (9) persons, to be


appointed three persons each by the Governor, President Pro Tempore


of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2026.




60-1-1384 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:46:04 AM

Req. No. 1384 Page 5